Wisconsin, session 2025, AB146.
do enact as follows:AB146,1Section 1. 108.09 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:108.09 (1) Filing. Claims for benefits shall be filed pursuant to department rules. Each employer that is notified of a benefit claim shall promptly inform the department in writing as to any eligibility question in objection to such claim together with the reasons for the objection. The department shall allow an employer no less than 12 business days to respond to an initial request from the department for information in response to a benefit claim. The department may also obtain information from the employee concerning the employee’s eligibility, employment or wages.AB146,2Section 2. Initial applicability.(1) This act first applies to requests for information related to claims filed for the week beginning on or after the effective date of this subsection. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab146 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab146 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB146 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB146 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»AB146: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting